Nevada, session 83, SB341.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 171.1975 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
171.1975 1. If a witness resides more than 100 miles from
the place of a preliminary examination or is unable to attend the
preliminary examination because of a medical condition, [or if good
cause otherwise exists,] the magistrate must allow the witness to
testify at the preliminary examination through the use of audiovisual
technology.
2. If a witness testifies at the preliminary examination through
the use of audiovisual technology:
(a) The testimony of the witness must be transcribed by a
certified court reporter; [and]
(b) Before giving testimony, the witness must [be sworn and
must] sign a sworn, written declaration, on a form provided by the
magistrate, which acknowledges that the witness understands that he
or she is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State and
may be subject to criminal prosecution for the commission of any
crime in connection with his or her testimony, including, without
limitation, perjury, and that the witness consents to such jurisdiction
[.] ; and
(c) Not later than 48 hours before the time set for the
preliminary examination, the State must file with the court both
the declaration and a notice stating whether it is necessary for the
witness to testify at the preliminary examination through the use
of audiovisual technology because the witness:
(1) Resides more than 100 miles from the place of the
preliminary examination; or
(2) Is unable to attend the preliminary examination
because of a medical condition.
3. Audiovisual technology used pursuant to this section must
ensure that the witness may be:
(a) Clearly heard and seen; and
(b) Examined and cross-examined.
4. As used in this section, “audiovisual technology” includes,
without limitation, closed-circuit video and videoconferencing.
-
*SB341_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 172.138 is hereby amended to read as follows:
172.138 1. If a witness resides more than 100 miles from the
place of a grand jury proceeding or is unable to attend the grand jury
proceeding because of a medical condition, [or if good cause
otherwise exists,] the district judge supervising the proceedings of
the grand jury must allow a witness to testify before the grand jury
through the use of audiovisual technology.
2. If a witness testifies at the grand jury proceeding through the
use of audiovisual technology:
(a) The testimony of the witness must be transcribed by a
certified court reporter appointed pursuant to NRS 172.215 in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 172.225; [and]
(b) Before giving testimony, the witness must [be sworn and
must] sign a sworn, written declaration, on a form provided by the
district judge, which acknowledges that the witness understands that
he or she is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State and
may be subject to criminal prosecution for the commission of any
crime in connection with his or her testimony, including, without
limitation, perjury, and that the witness consents to such jurisdiction
[.] ; and
(c) Not later than 48 hours before the time set for the grand
jury proceeding, the State must file with the court both the
declaration and a notice stating whether it is necessary for the
witness to testify at the grand jury proceeding through the use of
audiovisual technology because the witness:
(1) Resides more than 100 miles from the place of the
grand jury proceeding; or
(2) Is unable to attend the grand jury proceeding because
of a medical condition.
3. Audiovisual technology used pursuant to this section must
ensure that the witness may be:
(a) Clearly heard and seen; and
(b) Examined.
4. As used in this section, “audiovisual technology” includes,
without limitation, closed-circuit video and videoconferencing.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to any
offense that is the subject of a preliminary examination or grand jury
proceeding commenced on or after October 1, 2025, regardless of
when the offense is committed.
H
-
*SB341_R1*